Utah statutes.
78B-19-110.   Standards of professional responsibility and mandatory reporting not affected.

This chapter does not affect:

(1)  the professional responsibility obligations and standards applicable to a lawyer or other licensed professional; or

(2)  the obligation of a person to report abuse or neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of a child or adult under the law of this state.

